Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 27

Water and Waterworks Companies

65-27-101. Power of condemnation.

Any water company is empowered to acquire, by purchase, condemnation, or other proper method, the right to use and divert the water flowing and running into any stream or watercourse which may be necessary to the exercise of any of the powers of a public or quasi public character granted to the corporation; and whenever it shall be necessary so to divert the water from any such stream or watercourse, the corporation shall have the right to have the water to be so diverted and the land so to be used, over which it shall be conducted, condemned, and the value thereof assessed in the manner provided in title 29, chapter 16; and it may in like manner take such land, water, and riparian rights, and such rights-of-way as may be necessary for establishing and maintaining its power houses, canals, flumes, conduits, pipelines, ponds, dams, reservoirs, and other works, and the rights-of-way to any and all lands between its ponds, dams, and reservoirs and power houses, and the cities, towns, and villages and other points at which its water may be transmitted, consumed, or disposed of as may be necessary to place its conductors, canals, flumes, pipelines, either above or underground, and may at any time enter thereon and repair same, or when deemed advisable, to place additional equipment, appliances, or appurtenances; but, in all cases, such act shall be done in such manner and with such haste as to do as little injury to private property as possible.

Any exercise of the powers granted under this section is subject to and shall not conflict with the Water Quality Control Act, compiled in title 69, chapter 3, part 2 [repealed], or the Inter-basin Water Transfer Act, compiled in title 69, ch. 7, part 2 and the regulations thereunder.

Acts 1909, ch. 127, § 5; Shan., § 2489a5; mod. Code 1932, § 4067; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2701; Acts 2000, ch. 854, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 69, chapter 3, part 2, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 488, § 2.

Cross-References. Assessment of property for tax purposes, title 67, ch. 5, part 13.

Consolidation of lighting and power facilities, § 65-22-106.

Privilege tax on gas, water and electric companies, § 67-4-405.

Water power companies, acquisition of land by condemnation or purchase, § 65-22-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, §§ 7, 17; 19 Tenn. Juris., Monopolies and Restraints of Trade, § 4; 25 Tenn. Juris., Water Companies and Waterworks, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Water Rights in Tennessee (Mahlon L. Townsend), 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 557 (1960).

65-27-102. Companies contracting to supply water to charitable institutions.

Water companies incorporated under the laws of this state which have or may have contracts to supply with waters, state or national homes for disabled soldiers, insane asylums, state or national schools for the correction and reformation of juvenile criminals, or any like institution of public charity, are empowered to condemn springs, creeks, and waters, and the riparian rights of lower owners for the purpose of furnishing such water supply. Such uses of waters for the objects here enumerated are each declared a public use.

Acts 1903, ch. 134, § 1; Shan., § 2506a 1; Code 1932, § 4072; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2702.

65-27-103. Compensation to owners for property condemned.

Such water company so condemning the water or riparian rights shall make compensation to the owners thereof for such water or rights as may be condemned and the compensation shall be paid by the water company.

Acts 1903, ch. 134, § 2; Shan., § 2506a2; Code 1932, § 4073; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2703.

65-27-104. Bond by water company pending assessment of damages.

Pending the assessment of damages and any litigation in regard thereto, the water company may give bond with good and solvent securities, payable to the owner or owners of the water or rights, to promptly pay to the owner any amount of damages which may be assessed by the jury as provided for in § 65-27-101, and upon executing and filing such bond may thereupon take the water or waters.

Acts 1903, ch. 134, § 4; Shan., § 2506a4; Code 1932, § 4074; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2704.

65-27-105. Authority to lay pipes.

To enable the corporation to establish its works, it is empowered to:

Lay down pipes through the streets, lanes, and alleys of the town, city, or village in such manner as to produce the least possible inconvenience to the town, city, or village, or to its inhabitants, or to travelers; and

Take up pavements and sidewalks;

provided, that it shall repair the same with the least possible delay.

Acts 1877, ch. 104, § 1; Shan., § 2492; Code 1932, § 4066; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2705.

65-27-106. Extension and placement of conductors, pipelines, hydrants and fire plugs.

Such corporation, after having first obtained permission from the governing authorities thereof, is invested with the privilege of extending and placing its conductors, pipes, and pipelines along, through, or upon all or any of the streets, lanes, and alleys of the cities, towns, and villages in which it may operate, and in, through, and along any and all of the roads, and public highways of the counties, and of erecting hydrants and fire plugs at suitable places along the streets, lanes, alleys, roads, and public highways for the purpose of supplying water to the inhabitants thereof for manufacturing, domestic, or sanitary or other purposes, and for such purposes it may make any and all necessary excavations in and along the same after first obtaining permission from the governing authorities of the incorporated cities, towns, and villages, and when outside of any incorporated towns, of the governing authority of the county in which same is located; but all excavations shall be made in such manner as to give the least inconvenience to the public, and shall be replaced with all possible speed by and at the expense of the corporation in as substantial manner as found before being excavated.

Acts 1909, ch. 127, § 3; Shan., § 2489a3; mod. Code 1932, § 4068; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2706.

Cross-References. Municipal power over franchises, § 6-54-109.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Monopolies and Restraints of Trade, § 4.

65-27-107. Injury or destruction of company property or unauthorized connections.

It is unlawful for any person to injure or destroy any of the pipes, fixtures, or other property of the company, or to turn on water, or to make any connection with the pipes, or other fixtures after the same has been shut off, stopped, or disconnected by the company.

Acts 1909, ch. 127, § 6; Shan., § 2489a6; Code 1932, § 4069; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2707.

Cross-References. Vandalism, § 39-14-408.

65-27-108. Use of company property without contract.

It is also unlawful for any person to take or use any water, or other thing belonging to the company for any purpose without having previously contracted with the company therefor.

Acts 1909, ch. 127, § 6; Shan., § 2489a7; mod. Code 1932, § 4070; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2708.

65-27-109. Pollution of water or reservoir.

It is also unlawful for any person to willfully corrupt or permit anything to run or fall into any stream or reservoir from which the corporation takes water for the purpose of supplying any city, town, or village, or the inhabitants thereof, which will corrupt the same or render it unpalatable, unwholesome, or unfit for use for any purpose for which it may be supplied, or to bathe in or lead any animal into the same.

Acts 1909, ch. 127, § 6; Shan., § 2489a8; Code 1932, § 4071; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2709.

Cross-References. Vandalism, § 39-14-408.

Law Reviews.

Water Rights in Tennessee (Mahlon L. Townsend), 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 557 (1960).